Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1806
Committee; hearing officers; appointment.

The executive director may serve as a hearing officer pursuant to this section and in addition the committee, with the approval of the commission, shall appoint one or more additional hearing officers, who shall be licensed to practice law in the state, to conduct hearings, take testimony in proceedings under the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act, and make determinations of any matter subject to such act.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 6;

Laws 1981, LB 328, § 6;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 7;

Laws 1991, LB 186, § 2.